District of Columbia statutes.
38-1108

Appropriation in lieu of donation of public lands.

In lieu of extending to the District of Columbia those provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862 (7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305 , 307 , and 308 ), relating to donations of public lands or land scrip for the endowment and maintenance of colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts, there is authorized to be appropriated to the District of Columbia the sum of $7,241,706. Amounts appropriated under this section shall be held and considered to have been granted to the District of Columbia subject to those provisions of that Act applicable to the proceeds from the sale of land or land scrip, except that the funds appropriated in this section also may be invested in equity based securities if approved by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia. In addition, any proceeds and interest accruing thereon, which remain from the sale of the former radio station WDCU in an escrow account of the District of Columbia Financial Management and Assistance Authority for the benefit of the University of the District of Columbia, shall be used for the University of the District of Columbia’s Endowment Fund. Such proceeds may be invested in equity based securities if approved by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia.

Nov. 7, 1966, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 108(b)
June 20, 1968, 82 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 90-354, § 1
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-142, Pub. L. 105-277, § 139
Jul. 24, 2001, Pub. L. 107-20, Chap. 3, 115 Stat. 155
This section is referenced in § 38-1107, § 38-1110, and § 38-1111.
1981 Ed., § 31-1408.
1973 Ed., § 31-1608.
Section 139 of Pub. L. 105-277 added the exception to the end of the second sentence.
Pub. L. 107-20 added the last sentence.